languages/apertium-mkd/apertium-mkd.mkd.dix
<pardef n="на/јде__vblex"> <!-- perf perf"/><s n="tv -->  <!-- свършен вид -->
  <e>        <p>          <l>јди</l>          <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдете</l>        <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>јдам</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдеш</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јде</l>          <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдеме</l>        <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдете</l>        <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдат</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>јдев</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдеше</l>        <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдеше</l>        <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдевме</l>       <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдевте</l>       <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдеа</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>јдел</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдела</l>        <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдело</l>        <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јделе</l>        <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>јдов</l>          <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јде</l>           <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јде</l>           <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдовме</l>        <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдовте</l>        <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>јдоа</l>          <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>шол</l>          <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>шла</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>шло</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>шле</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

 <e>        <p>          <l>јден</l>          <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јдениот</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јдениов</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јденион</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јдена</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јдената</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јденава</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јденана</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јдено</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јденото</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јденово</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јденоно</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јдени</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јдените</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јдениве</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>јденине</l>         <r>јде<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

	<e lm="најде"><i>на</i><par n="на/јде__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="пронајде"><i>прона</i><par n="на/јде__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="изнајде"><i>изна</i><par n="на/јде__vblex"/></e>
